District of Columbia statutes.
6-504

Review of excavation, grading, filling, or construction permit applications; mudslide hazards.

The Mayor shall review each permit application for any excavation, grading, fill, or construction to determine whether the proposed site and improvements will be reasonably safe from mudslides. If a proposed site and improvements are in a location that may have mudslide hazards, a further review shall be made by persons qualified in geology and soils engineering; and the proposed new construction, substantial improvement, or grading must:

(1)

Be adequately protected against mudslide damage; and

(2)

Not aggravate the existing hazard.

History

May 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-64, § 5, 22 DCR 7146

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-304.
1973 Ed., § 5-1104.